Vermont, session 2025-2026, H386.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 6 V.S.A. chapter 208 is added to read:
CHAPTER 208. AGRICULTURAL LAND TRANSFER ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM
§ 4651. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Agency” means the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets.
(2) “Farming” has the same meaning as in 10 V.S.A. § 6001(22).
(3) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets.
VT LEG #380800 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.386
2025 Page 2 of 7
§ 4652. AGRICULTURAL LAND TRANSFER ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
The Agricultural Land Transfer Assistance Program is established at the
Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets to:
(1) identify agricultural land in the State that may be available for
transfer or succession;
(2) provide farm owners with assistance in succession planning or
finding willing purchasers who will maintain the land for farming;
(3) assist new farmers in accessing capital or financing to purchase
agricultural land;
(4) connect owners of agricultural land with purchasers willing to retain
the land for farming; and
(5) implement the assistance, tools, and programs established under this
chapter.
§ 4653. FARM OWNERSHIP SUCCESSION PLANNING
(a) The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets, after consultation with
the Secretary of Commerce and Community Development, shall establish the
Farm Ownership Succession Planning Program to provide farmers assistance
with planning for succession of ownership of agricultural land.
(b)(1) As part of the Program, the Secretary shall develop a succession
planning toolkit that can be used by farm owners who are planning on selling
or closing their farm. The toolkit shall include the following:
VT LEG #380800 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.386
2025 Page 3 of 7
(A) a summary of financial resources available to prospective
farmers interested in buying farms and farmland for the purpose of farming;
(B) an itemized list of all farming-related education and support
programs in place at public and private institutions of higher learning in the
State;
(C) a list of State-supported economic development funding for
farming and for sustaining farming;
(D) a list of organizations in the State and in adjoining states that
auction and sell farming equipment and farming supplies;
(E) a list of insurance and financial services requirements impacting
the sale and purchasing of farms and farmland;
(F) forms, legal templates, and other resources that may be helpful in
exercising the transfer of agricultural land; and
(G) a directory of professionals, such as attorneys or accountants, that
have experience in completing farm transfers.
(2) The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall make the
toolkit available on the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets’ website to
any person who requests the toolkit.
(c) As part of the Program, the Secretary shall conduct at least three
educational workshops a year for the purpose of connecting owners of
VT LEG #380800 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.386
2025 Page 4 of 7
agricultural land who are planning on selling farmland with prospective
farmers interested in purchasing or leasing agricultural land.
(d) The Secretary shall train Agency staff or contract for services to aid
farmers exiting farming and those beginning farmers navigate the land transfer
process with the tools and resources available under the Program. These
persons shall be known as land transfer navigators, and they shall be available
to meet with prospective sellers and purchasers individually to facilitate lands
transfers that maintain agricultural land for farming. Land transfer navigators
shall also provide assistance to sellers and purchasers regarding the regulatory
requirements related to land transfer and related to the ownership or operation
of a farm, such as compliance with the Required Agricultural Practices.
§ 4654. AGRICULTURAL LAND PORTAL
The Secretary shall develop an agricultural land portal as an online tool on
the Agency’s website that allows persons seeking to sell agricultural land to
connect with persons seeking to purchase agricultural land. The tool shall
include those public postings of agricultural land available for sale or lease,
and instructions on how prospective purchasers can connect with sellers.
§ 4655. LAND TRANSFER AND SUCCESSION BOARD
(a) Creation. There is created the Land Transfer and Succession Board,
which for administrative purposes shall be attached to the Agency of
Agriculture, Food and Markets.
VT LEG #380800 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.386
2025 Page 5 of 7
(b) Organization of Board. The Board shall be composed of:
(1) the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets or designee;
(2) a representative of the Vermont Farm and Forest Viability Program
at the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) a representative of the Vermont Land Trust, appointed by the
Committee on Committees;
(4) a representative of Land for Good, appointed by the Speaker of the
House; and
(5) a representative of the Vermont Farm to Plate Initiative, appointed
by the Committee on Committees.
(c) Member terms. The members of the Board shall be appointed for terms
of three years or until the member’s earlier resignation or removal. A vacancy
shall be filled by the appointing authority for the remainder of the unexpired
term. An appointed member shall serve not more than three consecutive three-
year terms.
(d) Powers. The Board shall:
(1) assist the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets with
implementation of the requirements of this chapter, including fundraising and
development of expertise in land succession or acquisition; and
VT LEG #380800 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.386
2025 Page 6 of 7
(2) recommend programs or tools to develop to assist in the transition of
agricultural lands in Vermont from current farmers to those persons with
aspirations to farm.
(e) Officers; committees. The Board may elect officers, establish one or
more committees or subcommittees, and adopt procedural rules as it shall
determine necessary and appropriate to perform its work.
(f) Quorum; meetings; voting. A majority of the sitting members shall
constitute a quorum, and action taken by the Board may be authorized by a
majority of the members present and voting at any regular or special meeting at
which a quorum is present. The Board may permit any or all members to
participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through
the use of, any means of communication, including an electronic,
telecommunications, and video- or audio-conferencing conference telephone
call, by which all members participating may simultaneously or sequentially
communicate with each other during the meeting. A member participating in a
meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.
(g) Compensation. Private sector members shall be entitled to per diem
compensation authorized under 32 V.S.A. § 1010(b) for each day spent in the
performance of their duties, and each member shall be reimbursed from the
Fund for the member’s actual and necessary expenses incurred in carrying out
the member’s duties.
VT LEG #380800 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.386
2025 Page 7 of 7
Sec. 2. TAX INCENTIVES FOR LAND TRANSFER AND SUCCESSION;
REPORT
The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets, after consultation with the
Commissioner of Taxes, shall submit to the House Committees on Agriculture,
Food Resiliency, and Forestry and on Ways and Means and the Senate
Committees on Agriculture and on Finance recommended tax incentives or
other financial incentives that would facilitate transfer or succession of
agricultural lands from current farm owners to prospective farm owners.
Sec. 3. APPROPRIATION
In addition to other funds appropriated to the Agency of Agriculture, Food
and Markets in fiscal year 2026, the sum of $250,000.00 is appropriated to the
Agency from the General Fund in fiscal year 2026 for implementation by the
Agency of the Agricultural Land Transfer Assistance Program established in
6 V.S.A. chapter 208.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380800 v.1